phon-exception-root.xfst
define intSym @"intermediate-symbols.a";
define boundary ⟪MB⟫|⟪RB⟫|⟪IGB⟫|intSym;

! --------------------------------------------------------------------------
! the verb roots 'de-' and 'ye-' becom di- and yi- if a suffix
! starting with a 'y' follows
! --------------------------------------------------------------------------
regex e -> i || .#. [d|y]  _  boundary+ (⟪bI⟫|⟪bA⟫) [⟪by⟫|y]
   ,, e -> e || .#. d  _  boundary+ ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫ p ⟪MB⟫
! --------------------------------------------------------------------------
! -yor exception - `a' `e' and underspecified low-unrounded vowel `A' becomes
! corresponding high vowel before the suffix -yor
! --------------------------------------------------------------------------
   .o. [a|e|⟪A⟫] -> ⟪I⟫ ||  _  boundary+ ⟪bI⟫ y o r ⟪MB⟫;
